2_Optimized Recursive File Scanning & Data Extraction /analyzedir/tests/tests-2/test5/hyph-hsb.hyp.txt
War-sza-wa
do-zna
njej-sym
njej-sy
nje-je
njej-sm??j
njej-staj
njej-stej
njej-smy
njej-s??e
njej-su
p??ede
p??e-derje
tkalc
nje??d??
ze-tnu
ze-tnje??
ze-tnje
ze-tnje-m??j
ze-tnje-taj
ze-tnje-tej
ze-tnje-my
ze-tnje-??e
wote-tnu
wote-tnje??
wote-tnje
wote-tnje-m??j
wote-tnje-taj
wote-tnje-tej
wote-tnje-my
wote-tnje-??e
wo-dnjo
wo-snje
tak-rjec
